Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-515
Practice of audiology or speech-language pathology; license or privilege to practice; applicant; requirements.

(1) Every applicant for a license to practice audiology shall (a)(i) for applicants graduating prior to September 1, 2007, present proof of a master's degree, a doctoral degree, or the equivalent of a master's degree or doctoral degree in audiology from an academic program approved by the board, and (ii) for applicants graduating on or after September 1, 2007, present proof of a doctoral degree or its equivalent in audiology, (b) present proof of no less than thirty-six weeks of full-time professional experience or equivalent half-time professional experience in audiology, supervised in the area in which licensure is sought, and (c) successfully complete an examination approved by the board.

(2) Every applicant for a license to practice speech-language pathology shall (a) present proof of a master's degree, a doctoral degree, or the equivalent of a master's degree or doctoral degree in speech-language pathology from an academic program approved by the board, (b) present proof of no less than thirty-six weeks of full-time professional experience or equivalent half-time professional experience in speech-language pathology, supervised in the area in which licensure is sought, and (c) successfully complete an examination approved by the board.

(3) Presentation of official documentation of certification by a nationwide professional accrediting organization approved by the board shall be deemed equivalent to the requirements of this section.

(4) Every applicant for a privilege to practice audiology or speech-language pathology under the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact shall present proof of authorization from a member state, as defined in section 38-4101, to practice as an audiologist or speech-language pathologist.

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 17;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 18;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 67;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,190;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 200;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1178;

Laws 2021, LB14, § 2.

Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, see section 38-4101.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.